test/src/morphology/N-amaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - amā: # Noun 19 'eng /est kõik/fin' - full paradigm
     amā+N+Sg+Nom: amā
     amā+N+Sg+Gen: amā
     amā+N+Sg+Par: aʼmmõ
     amā+N+Sg+Dat: amān
     amā+N+Sg+Ins: amāks
     amā+N+Sg+Ill: aʼmmõ
     amā+N+Sg+Ela: amāst
     amā+N+Pl+Nom: amād
     amā+N+Pl+Gen: amād
     amā+N+Pl+Par: äʼmḑi
     amā+N+Pl+Dat: amādõn
     amā+N+Pl+Ins: amādõks
     amā+N+Pl+Ill: äʼmži
     amā+N+Pl+Ela: äʼmšti
